New York, session 2025-2026, S5638.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2596 to read as follows: 3 § 2596. CPR and AED instruction; youth leagues. 1. For the purposes of 4 this section: 5 (a) "youth league" means youth recreation sports leagues other than 6 school leagues, including youth club sports, travel teams, community 7 based organization leagues, and unaffiliated leagues; and 8 (b) "youth recreation" means athletic activity with participants who 9 are all eighteen years old or younger and shall include grade school 10 through high school athletic programs regardless of the age of the 11 participants. 12 2. On and after the effective date of this section, to coach in any 13 youth league, it shall be required of such coaches, except as provided 14 in subdivision three or four of this section, to complete a training in 15 cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator (CPR 16 and AED) knowledge and skills approved by the commissioner. Any such 17 course of study or equivalent requirements shall include instruction in 18 recognizing signs and symptoms of cardiac arrest and sudden cardiac 19 arrest and the administration of adult and child cardiopulmonary resus- 20 citation and the use of an automated external defibrillator. Prior to 21 the start of each sports season, coaches shall provide valid evidence to 22 their youth league that their adult and child cardiopulmonary resusci- 23 tation and automated external defibrillator knowledge and skills are 24 current pursuant to the requirements approved by the commissioner. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06658-01-5 S. 5638 2 1 3. Except as provided in subdivision four of this section, persons who 2 have been coaches of youth league sports on the effective date of this 3 section who have not completed a training in CPR and AED knowledge and 4 skills pursuant to subdivision two of this section, or met equivalent 5 requirements as approved by the commissioner, may continue to coach such 6 sports, provided, however, that such coaches do complete such a training 7 as soon as practicable after the effective date of this section but not 8 later than twelve months thereafter, provided, however, that the commis- 9 sioner shall have the authority to establish by rule or regulation an 10 additional time schedule for compliance with this section. 11 4. A person who is unable to complete a training in CPR and AED know- 12 ledge and skills pursuant to subdivision two of this section, or has not 13 met equivalent requirements as approved by the commissioner, due to a 14 physical disability may coach any youth league sport if there is another 15 person who has completed a training pursuant to subdivision two of this 16 section and is present with such person who is unable to complete such a 17 training at all times during the youth league sports including but not 18 limited to practices, scrimmages and during competition. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 20 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 21 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 22 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 23 on or before such effective date.